Massachusetts, session 194th, H4498.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 53 of the general laws, or any other general or
special law or by-law of the town of Conway to the contrary, the caucuses for the nomination of
town officers shall be eliminated in the town of Conway, and the nomination of eligible
candidates for town offices shall be made by the filing of nomination papers in accordance with
sections 7 and 10 of chapter 35 of the general laws. Ballots used at a regular or special town
election of town officers shall not have printed thereon a party or political designation or mark,
and there shall not be any political designation or mark appended to the name of a candidate for
town office.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1